Illinois, session 104th, HB3499.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Act is amended by changing 5Section 16-107.5 and the heading of Article XX and Sections 620-101, 20-102, 20-105, 20-110, and 20-130 and by adding 7Sections 20-140 and 20-145 as follows: 8    (220 ILCS 5/16-107.5)9    Sec. 16-107.5. Net electricity metering.10    (a) The General Assembly finds and declares that a program 11to provide net electricity metering, as defined in this 12Section, for eligible customers can encourage private 13investment in renewable energy resources, stimulate economic 14growth, enhance the continued diversification of Illinois' 15energy resource mix, and protect the Illinois environment. 16Further, to achieve the goals of this Act that robust options 17for customer-site distributed generation continue to thrive in 18Illinois, the General Assembly finds that a predictable 19transition must be ensured for customers between full net 20metering at the retail electricity rate to the distribution 21generation rebate described in Section 16-107.6. 22    (b) As used in this Section, (i) "community renewable 23generation project" shall have the meaning set forth in   HB3499 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power Agency Act; (ii) "eligible 2customer" means a retail customer that owns, hosts, or 3operates, including any third-party owned systems, a solar, 4wind, or other eligible renewable electrical generating 5facility that is located on the customer's premises or 6customer's side of the billing meter and is intended primarily 7to offset the customer's own current or future electrical 8requirements; (iii) "electricity provider" means an electric 9utility or alternative retail electric supplier; (iv) 10"eligible renewable electrical generating facility" means a 11generator, which may include the co-location of an energy 12storage system, that is interconnected under rules adopted by 13the Commission and is powered by solar electric energy, wind, 14dedicated crops grown for electricity generation, agricultural 15residues, untreated and unadulterated wood waste, livestock 16manure, anaerobic digestion of livestock or food processing 17waste, fuel cells or microturbines powered by renewable fuels, 18or hydroelectric energy; (v) "net electricity metering" (or 19"net metering") means the measurement, during the billing 20period applicable to an eligible customer, of the net amount 21of electricity supplied by an electricity provider to the 22customer or provided to the electricity provider by the 23customer or subscriber; (vi) "subscriber" shall have the 24meaning as set forth in Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power 25Agency Act; (vii) "subscription" shall have the meaning set 26forth in Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power Agency Act; (viii)   HB3499 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1"energy storage system" means commercially available 2technology that is capable of absorbing energy and storing it 3for a period of time for use at a later time, including, but 4not limited to, electrochemical, thermal, and 5electromechanical technologies, and may be interconnected 6behind the customer's meter or interconnected behind its own 7meter; and (ix) "future electrical requirements" means modeled 8electrical requirements upon occupation of a new or vacant 9property, and other reasonable expectations of future 10electrical use, as well as, for occupied properties, a 11reasonable approximation of the annual load of 2 electric 12vehicles and, for non-electric heating customers, a reasonable 13approximation of the incremental electric load associated with 14fuel switching. The approximations shall be applied to the 15appropriate net metering tariff and do not need to be unique to 16each individual eligible customer. The utility shall submit 17these approximations to the Commission for review, 18modification, and approval.19    (c) A net metering facility shall be equipped with 20metering equipment that can measure the flow of electricity in 21both directions at the same rate.22        (1) For eligible customers whose electric service has 23    not been declared competitive pursuant to Section 16-113 24    of this Act as of July 1, 2011 and whose electric delivery 25    service is provided and measured on a kilowatt-hour basis 26    and electric supply service is not provided based on   HB3499 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1    hourly pricing, this shall typically be accomplished 2    through use of a single, bi-directional meter. If the 3    eligible customer's existing electric revenue meter does 4    not meet this requirement, the electricity provider shall 5    arrange for the local electric utility or a meter service 6    provider to install and maintain a new revenue meter at 7    the electricity provider's expense, which may be the smart 8    meter described by subsection (b) of Section 16-108.5 of 9    this Act.10        (2) For eligible customers whose electric service has 11    not been declared competitive pursuant to Section 16-113 12    of this Act as of July 1, 2011 and whose electric delivery 13    service is provided and measured on a kilowatt demand 14    basis and electric supply service is not provided based on 15    hourly pricing, this shall typically be accomplished 16    through use of a dual channel meter capable of measuring 17    the flow of electricity both into and out of the 18    customer's facility at the same rate and ratio. If such 19    customer's existing electric revenue meter does not meet 20    this requirement, then the electricity provider shall 21    arrange for the local electric utility or a meter service 22    provider to install and maintain a new revenue meter at 23    the electricity provider's expense, which may be the smart 24    meter described by subsection (b) of Section 16-108.5 of 25    this Act.26        (3) For all other eligible customers, until such time   HB3499 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1    as the local electric utility installs a smart meter, as 2    described by subsection (b) of Section 16-108.5 of this 3    Act, the electricity provider may arrange for the local 4    electric utility or a meter service provider to install 5    and maintain metering equipment capable of measuring the 6    flow of electricity both into and out of the customer's 7    facility at the same rate and ratio, typically through the 8    use of a dual channel meter. If the eligible customer's 9    existing electric revenue meter does not meet this 10    requirement, then the costs of installing such equipment 11    shall be paid for by the customer. 12    (d) An electricity provider shall measure and charge or 13credit for the net electricity supplied to eligible customers 14or provided by eligible customers whose electric service has 15not been declared competitive pursuant to Section 16-113 of 16this Act as of July 1, 2011 and whose electric delivery service 17is provided and measured on a kilowatt-hour basis and electric 18supply service is not provided based on hourly pricing in the 19following manner:20        (1) If the amount of electricity used by the customer 21    during the billing period exceeds the amount of 22    electricity produced by the customer, the electricity 23    provider shall charge the customer for the net electricity 24    supplied to and used by the customer as provided in 25    subsection (e-5) of this Section.26        (2) If the amount of electricity produced by a   HB3499 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1    customer during the billing period exceeds the amount of 2    electricity used by the customer during that billing 3    period, the electricity provider supplying that customer 4    shall apply a 1:1 kilowatt-hour credit to a subsequent 5    bill for service to the customer for the net electricity 6    supplied to the electricity provider. The electricity 7    provider shall continue to carry over any excess 8    kilowatt-hour credits earned and apply those credits to 9    subsequent billing periods to offset any 10    customer-generator consumption in those billing periods 11    until all credits are used or until the end of the 12    annualized period.13        (3) At the end of the year or annualized over the 14    period that service is supplied by means of net metering, 15    or in the event that the retail customer terminates 16    service with the electricity provider prior to the end of 17    the year or the annualized period, any remaining credits 18    in the customer's account shall expire.19    (d-5) An electricity provider shall measure and charge or 20credit for the net electricity supplied to eligible customers 21or provided by eligible customers whose electric service has 22not been declared competitive pursuant to Section 16-113 of 23this Act as of July 1, 2011 and whose electric delivery service 24is provided and measured on a kilowatt-hour basis and electric 25supply service is provided based on hourly pricing or 26time-of-use rates in the following manner:  HB3499 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1        (1) If the amount of electricity used by the customer 2    during any hourly period or time-of-use period exceeds the 3    amount of electricity produced by the customer, the 4    electricity provider shall charge the customer for the net 5    electricity supplied to and used by the customer according 6    to the terms of the contract or tariff to which the same 7    customer would be assigned to or be eligible for if the 8    customer was not a net metering customer.9        (2) If the amount of electricity produced by a 10    customer during any hourly period or time-of-use period 11    exceeds the amount of electricity used by the customer 12    during that hourly period or time-of-use period, the 13    energy provider shall apply a credit for the net 14    kilowatt-hours produced in such period. The credit shall 15    consist of an energy credit and a delivery service credit. 16    The energy credit shall be valued at the same price per 17    kilowatt-hour as the electric service provider would 18    charge for kilowatt-hour energy sales during that same 19    hourly period or time-of-use period. The delivery credit 20    shall be equal to the net kilowatt-hours produced in such 21    hourly period or time-of-use period times a credit that 22    reflects all kilowatt-hour based charges in the customer's 23    electric service rate, excluding energy charges. 24    (e) An electricity provider shall measure and charge or 25credit for the net electricity supplied to eligible customers 26whose electric service has not been declared competitive   HB3499 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1pursuant to Section 16-113 of this Act as of July 1, 2011 and 2whose electric delivery service is provided and measured on a 3kilowatt demand basis and electric supply service is not 4provided based on hourly pricing in the following manner:5        (1) If the amount of electricity used by the customer 6    during the billing period exceeds the amount of 7    electricity produced by the customer, then the electricity 8    provider shall charge the customer for the net electricity 9    supplied to and used by the customer as provided in 10    subsection (e-5) of this Section. The customer shall 11    remain responsible for all taxes, fees, and utility 12    delivery charges that would otherwise be applicable to the 13    net amount of electricity used by the customer.14        (2) If the amount of electricity produced by a 15    customer during the billing period exceeds the amount of 16    electricity used by the customer during that billing 17    period, then the electricity provider supplying that 18    customer shall apply a 1:1 kilowatt-hour credit that 19    reflects the kilowatt-hour based charges in the customer's 20    electric service rate to a subsequent bill for service to 21    the customer for the net electricity supplied to the 22    electricity provider. The electricity provider shall 23    continue to carry over any excess kilowatt-hour credits 24    earned and apply those credits to subsequent billing 25    periods to offset any customer-generator consumption in 26    those billing periods until all credits are used or until   HB3499 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1    the end of the annualized period.2        (3) At the end of the year or annualized over the 3    period that service is supplied by means of net metering, 4    or in the event that the retail customer terminates 5    service with the electricity provider prior to the end of 6    the year or the annualized period, any remaining credits 7    in the customer's account shall expire.8    (e-5) An electricity provider shall provide electric 9service to eligible customers who utilize net metering at 10non-discriminatory rates that are identical, with respect to 11rate structure, retail rate components, and any monthly 12charges, to the rates that the customer would be charged if not 13a net metering customer. An electricity provider shall not 14charge net metering customers any fee or charge or require 15additional equipment, insurance, or any other requirements not 16specifically authorized by interconnection standards 17authorized by the Commission, unless the fee, charge, or other 18requirement would apply to other similarly situated customers 19who are not net metering customers. The customer will remain 20responsible for all taxes, fees, and utility delivery charges 21that would otherwise be applicable to the net amount of 22electricity used by the customer. Subsections (c) through (e) 23of this Section shall not be construed to prevent an 24arms-length agreement between an electricity provider and an 25eligible customer that sets forth different prices, terms, and 26conditions for the provision of net metering service,   HB3499 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1including, but not limited to, the provision of the 2appropriate metering equipment for non-residential customers.3    (f) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (c) 4through (e-5) of this Section, an electricity provider must 5require dual-channel metering for customers operating eligible 6renewable electrical generating facilities to whom the 7provisions of neither subsection (d), (d-5), nor (e) of this 8Section apply. In such cases, electricity charges and credits 9shall be determined as follows: 10        (1) The electricity provider shall assess and the 11    customer remains responsible for all taxes, fees, and 12    utility delivery charges that would otherwise be 13    applicable to the gross amount of kilowatt-hours supplied 14    to the eligible customer by the electricity provider.15        (2) Each month that service is supplied by means of 16    dual-channel metering, the electricity provider shall 17    compensate the eligible customer for any excess 18    kilowatt-hour credits at the electricity provider's 19    avoided cost of electricity supply over the monthly period 20    or as otherwise specified by the terms of a power-purchase 21    agreement negotiated between the customer and electricity 22    provider.23        (3) For all eligible net metering customers taking 24    service from an electricity provider under contracts or 25    tariffs employing hourly or time-of-use rates, any monthly 26    consumption of electricity shall be calculated according   HB3499 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1    to the terms of the contract or tariff to which the same 2    customer would be assigned to or be eligible for if the 3    customer was not a net metering customer. When those same 4    customer-generators are net generators during any discrete 5    hourly or time-of-use period, the net kilowatt-hours 6    produced shall be valued at the same price per 7    kilowatt-hour as the electric service provider would 8    charge for retail kilowatt-hour sales during that same 9    time-of-use period. 10    (g) For purposes of federal and State laws providing 11renewable energy credits or greenhouse gas credits, the 12eligible customer shall be treated as owning and having title 13to the renewable energy attributes, renewable energy credits, 14and greenhouse gas emission credits related to any electricity 15produced by the qualified generating unit. The electricity 16provider may not condition participation in a net metering 17program on the signing over of a customer's renewable energy 18credits; provided, however, this subsection (g) shall not be 19construed to prevent an arms-length agreement between an 20electricity provider and an eligible customer that sets forth 21the ownership or title of the credits.22    (h) Within 120 days after the effective date of this 23amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly, the Commission 24shall establish standards for net metering and, if the 25Commission has not already acted on its own initiative, 26standards for the interconnection of eligible renewable   HB3499 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1generating equipment to the utility system. The 2interconnection standards shall address any procedural 3barriers, delays, and administrative costs associated with the 4interconnection of customer-generation while ensuring the 5safety and reliability of the units and the electric utility 6system. The Commission shall consider the Institute of 7Electrical and Electronics Engineers (IEEE) Standard 1547 and 8the issues of (i) reasonable and fair fees and costs, (ii) 9clear timelines for major milestones in the interconnection 10process, (iii) nondiscriminatory terms of agreement, and (iv) 11any best practices for interconnection of distributed 12generation.13    (h-5) Within 90 days after the effective date of this 14amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, the Commission 15shall: 16        (1) establish an Interconnection Working Group. The 17    working group shall include representatives from electric 18    utilities, developers of renewable electric generating 19    facilities, other industries that regularly apply for 20    interconnection with the electric utilities, 21    representatives of distributed generation customers, the 22    Commission Staff, and such other stakeholders with a 23    substantial interest in the topics addressed by the 24    Interconnection Working Group. The Interconnection Working 25    Group shall address at least the following issues:26            (A) cost and best available technology for   HB3499 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1        interconnection and metering, including the 2        standardization and publication of standard costs;3            (B) transparency, accuracy and use of the 4        distribution interconnection queue and hosting 5        capacity maps;6            (C) distribution system upgrade cost avoidance 7        through use of advanced inverter functions;8            (D) predictability of the queue management process 9        and enforcement of timelines;10            (E) benefits and challenges associated with group 11        studies and cost sharing;12            (F) minimum requirements for application to the 13        interconnection process and throughout the 14        interconnection process to avoid queue clogging 15        behavior;16            (G) process and customer service for 17        interconnecting customers adopting distributed energy 18        resources, including energy storage;19            (H) options for metering distributed energy 20        resources, including energy storage;21            (I) interconnection of new technologies, including 22        smart inverters and energy storage;23            (J) collect, share, and examine data on Level 1 24        interconnection costs, including cost and type of 25        upgrades required for interconnection, and use this 26        data to inform the final standardized cost of Level 1   HB3499 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1        interconnection; and2            (K) such other technical, policy, and tariff 3        issues related to and affecting interconnection 4        performance and customer service as determined by the 5        Interconnection Working Group. 6        The Office of Retail and Renewable Market Development 7    Commission may create subcommittees of the Interconnection 8    Working Group to focus on specific issues of importance, 9    as appropriate. The Interconnection Working Group shall 10    report to the Office of Retail and Renewable Market 11    Development Commission on recommended improvements to 12    interconnection rules and tariffs and policies as 13    determined by the Interconnection Working Group at least 14    every year 6 months. Such reports shall include consensus 15    recommendations of the Interconnection Working Group and, 16    if applicable, additional recommendations for which 17    consensus was not reached. The Office of Retail and 18    Renewable Market Development Commission shall use the 19    report from the Interconnection Working Group to determine 20    whether processes should be commenced to formally codify 21    or implement the recommendations; and 22        (2) create or contract for an Ombudsman to resolve 23    interconnection disputes through non-binding arbitration. 24    The Ombudsman may be paid in full or in part through fees 25    levied on the initiators of the dispute. ; and26        (3) determine a single standardized cost for Level 1   HB3499 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1    interconnections, which shall not exceed $200. 2    On and after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 3the 104th General Assembly, the Office of Retail and Renewable 4Market Development is responsible for the administration and 5facilitation of the Working Group. 6    (i) All electricity providers shall begin to offer net 7metering no later than April 1, 2008.8    (j) An electricity provider shall provide net metering to 9eligible customers according to subsections (d), (d-5), and 10(e). Eligible renewable electrical generating facilities for 11which eligible customers registered for net metering before 12January 1, 2025 shall continue to receive net metering 13services according to subsections (d), (d-5), and (e) of this 14Section for the lifetime of the system, regardless of whether 15those retail customers change electricity providers or whether 16the retail customer benefiting from the system changes. On and 17after January 1, 2025, any eligible customer that applies for 18net metering and previously would have qualified under 19subsections (d), (d-5), or (e) shall only be eligible for net 20metering as described in subsection (n). 21    (k) Each electricity provider shall maintain records and 22report annually to the Commission the total number of net 23metering customers served by the provider, as well as the 24type, capacity, and energy sources of the generating systems 25used by the net metering customers. Nothing in this Section 26shall limit the ability of an electricity provider to request   HB3499 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1the redaction of information deemed by the Commission to be 2confidential business information.3    (l)(1) Notwithstanding the definition of "eligible 4customer" in item (ii) of subsection (b) of this Section, each 5electricity provider shall allow net metering as set forth in 6this subsection (l) and for the following projects, provided 7that only electric utilities serving more than 200,000 8customers as of January 1, 2021 shall provide net metering for 9projects that are eligible for subparagraph (C) of this 10paragraph (1) and have energized after the effective date of 11this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly: 12        (A) properties owned or leased by multiple customers 13    that contribute to the operation of an eligible renewable 14    electrical generating facility through an ownership or 15    leasehold interest of at least 200 watts in such facility, 16    such as a community-owned wind project, a community-owned 17    biomass project, a community-owned solar project, or a 18    community methane digester processing livestock waste from 19    multiple sources, provided that the facility is also 20    located within the utility's service territory; 21        (B) individual units, apartments, or properties 22    located in a single building that are owned or leased by 23    multiple customers and collectively served by a common 24    eligible renewable electrical generating facility, such as 25    an office or apartment building, a shopping center or 26    strip mall served by photovoltaic panels on the roof; and   HB3499 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1        (C) subscriptions to community renewable generation 2    projects, including community renewable generation 3    projects on the customer's side of the billing meter of a 4    host facility and partially used for the customer's own 5    load.6    In addition, the nameplate capacity of the eligible 7renewable electric generating facility that serves the demand 8of the properties, units, or apartments identified in 9paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection (l) shall not exceed 105,000 kilowatts in nameplate capacity in total. Any eligible 11renewable electrical generating facility or community 12renewable generation project that is powered by photovoltaic 13electric energy and installed after the effective date of this 14amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly must be installed 15by a qualified person in compliance with the requirements of 16Section 16-128A of the Public Utilities Act and any rules or 17regulations adopted thereunder.18    (2) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, an 19electricity provider shall provide credits for the electricity 20produced by the projects described in paragraph (1) of this 21subsection (l). The electricity provider shall provide credits 22that include at least energy supply, capacity, transmission, 23and, if applicable, the purchased energy adjustment on the 24subscriber's monthly bill equal to the subscriber's share of 25the production of electricity from the project, as determined 26by paragraph (3) of this subsection (l). For customers with   HB3499 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1transmission or capacity charges not charged on a 2kilowatt-hour basis, the electricity provider shall prepare a 3reasonable approximation of the kilowatt-hour equivalent value 4and provide that value as a monetary credit. The electricity 5provider shall submit these approximation methodologies to the 6Commission for review, modification, and approval. 7Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, customers on payment 8plans or participating in budget billing programs shall have 9credits applied on a monthly basis. 10    (3) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary and 11regardless of whether a subscriber to an eligible community 12renewable generation project receives power and energy service 13from the electric utility or an alternative retail electric 14supplier, for projects eligible under paragraph (C) of 15subparagraph (1) of this subsection (l), electric utilities 16serving more than 200,000 customers as of January 1, 2021 17shall provide the monetary credits to a subscriber's 18subsequent bill for the electricity produced by community 19renewable generation projects. The electric utility shall 20provide monetary credits to a subscriber's subsequent bill at 21the utility's total price to compare equal to the subscriber's 22share of the production of electricity from the project, as 23determined by paragraph (5) of this subsection (l). For the 24purposes of this subsection, "total price to compare" means 25the rate or rates published by the Illinois Commerce 26Commission for energy supply for eligible customers receiving   HB3499 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1supply service from the electric utility, and shall include 2energy, capacity, transmission, and the purchased energy 3adjustment. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, 4customers on payment plans or participating in budget billing 5programs shall have credits applied on a monthly basis. Any 6applicable credit or reduction in load obligation from the 7production of the community renewable generating projects 8receiving a credit under this subsection shall be credited to 9the electric utility to offset the cost of providing the 10credit. To the extent that the credit or load obligation 11reduction does not completely offset the cost of providing the 12credit to subscribers of community renewable generation 13projects as described in this subsection, the electric utility 14may recover the remaining costs through its Multi-Year Rate 15Plan. All electric utilities serving 200,000 or fewer 16customers as of January 1, 2021 shall only provide the 17monetary credits to a subscriber's subsequent bill for the 18electricity produced by community renewable generation 19projects if the subscriber receives power and energy service 20from the electric utility. Alternative retail electric 21suppliers providing power and energy service to a subscriber 22located within the service territory of an electric utility 23not subject to Sections 16-108.18 and 16-118 shall provide the 24monetary credits to the subscriber's subsequent bill for the 25electricity produced by community renewable generation 26projects.  HB3499 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1    (4) If requested by the owner or operator of a community 2renewable generating project, an electric utility serving more 3than 200,000 customers as of January 1, 2021 shall enter into a 4net crediting agreement with the owner or operator to include 5a subscriber's subscription fee on the subscriber's monthly 6electric bill and provide the subscriber with a net credit 7equivalent to the total bill credit value for that generation 8period minus the subscription fee, provided the subscription 9fee is structured as a fixed percentage of bill credit value. 10The net crediting agreement shall set forth payment terms from 11the electric utility to the owner or operator of the community 12renewable generating project, and the electric utility may 13charge a net crediting fee to the owner or operator of a 14community renewable generating project that may not exceed 2% 15of the bill credit value. Notwithstanding anything to the 16contrary, an electric utility serving 200,000 customers or 17fewer as of January 1, 2021 shall not be obligated to enter 18into a net crediting agreement with the owner or operator of a 19community renewable generating project. 20    (5) For the purposes of facilitating net metering, the 21owner or operator of the eligible renewable electrical 22generating facility or community renewable generation project 23shall be responsible for determining the amount of the credit 24that each customer or subscriber participating in a project 25under this subsection (l) is to receive in the following 26manner:   HB3499 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1        (A) The owner or operator shall, on a monthly basis, 2    provide to the electric utility the kilowatthours of 3    generation attributable to each of the utility's retail 4    customers and subscribers participating in projects under 5    this subsection (l) in accordance with the customer's or 6    subscriber's share of the eligible renewable electric 7    generating facility's or community renewable generation 8    project's output of power and energy for such month. The 9    owner or operator shall electronically transmit such 10    calculations and associated documentation to the electric 11    utility, in a format or method set forth in the applicable 12    tariff, on a monthly basis so that the electric utility 13    can reflect the monetary credits on customers' and 14    subscribers' electric utility bills. The electric utility 15    shall be permitted to revise its tariffs to implement the 16    provisions of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 17    Assembly. The owner or operator shall separately provide 18    the electric utility with the documentation detailing the 19    calculations supporting the credit in the manner set forth 20    in the applicable tariff. 21        (B) For those participating customers and subscribers 22    who receive their energy supply from an alternative retail 23    electric supplier, the electric utility shall remit to the 24    applicable alternative retail electric supplier the 25    information provided under subparagraph (A) of this 26    paragraph (3) for such customers and subscribers in a   HB3499 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1    manner set forth in such alternative retail electric 2    supplier's net metering program, or as otherwise agreed 3    between the utility and the alternative retail electric 4    supplier. The alternative retail electric supplier shall 5    then submit to the utility the amount of the charges for 6    power and energy to be applied to such customers and 7    subscribers, including the amount of the credit associated 8    with net metering. 9        (C) A participating customer or subscriber may provide 10    authorization as required by applicable law that directs 11    the electric utility to submit information to the owner or 12    operator of the eligible renewable electrical generating 13    facility or community renewable generation project to 14    which the customer or subscriber has an ownership or 15    leasehold interest or a subscription. Such information 16    shall be limited to the components of the net metering 17    credit calculated under this subsection (l), including the 18    bill credit rate, total kilowatthours, and total monetary 19    credit value applied to the customer's or subscriber's 20    bill for the monthly billing period. 21    (l-5) Within 90 days after the effective date of this 22amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, each electric 23utility subject to this Section shall file a tariff or tariffs 24to implement the provisions of subsection (l) of this Section, 25which shall, consistent with the provisions of subsection (l), 26describe the terms and conditions under which owners or   HB3499 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1operators of qualifying properties, units, or apartments may 2participate in net metering. The Commission shall approve, or 3approve with modification, the tariff within 120 days after 4the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 5Assembly. 6    (m) Nothing in this Section shall affect the right of an 7electricity provider to continue to provide, or the right of a 8retail customer to continue to receive service pursuant to a 9contract for electric service between the electricity provider 10and the retail customer in accordance with the prices, terms, 11and conditions provided for in that contract. Either the 12electricity provider or the customer may require compliance 13with the prices, terms, and conditions of the contract. 14    (n) On and after January 1, 2025, the net metering 15services described in subsections (d), (d-5), and (e) of this 16Section shall no longer be offered, except as to those 17eligible renewable electrical generating facilities for which 18retail customers are receiving net metering service under 19these subsections at the time the net metering services under 20those subsections are no longer offered; those systems shall 21continue to receive net metering services described in 22subsections (d), (d-5), and (e) of this Section for the 23lifetime of the system, regardless of if those retail 24customers change electricity providers or whether the retail 25customer benefiting from the system changes. The electric 26utility serving more than 200,000 customers as of January 1,   HB3499 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b12021 is responsible for ensuring the billing credits continue 2without lapse for the lifetime of systems, as required in 3subsection (o). Those retail customers that begin taking net 4metering service after the date that net metering services are 5no longer offered under such subsections shall be subject to 6the provisions set forth in the following paragraphs (1) 7through (3) of this subsection (n):8        (1) An electricity provider shall charge or credit for 9    the net electricity supplied to eligible customers or 10    provided by eligible customers whose electric supply 11    service is not provided based on hourly pricing in the 12    following manner:13            (A) If the amount of electricity used by the 14        customer during the monthly billing period exceeds the 15        amount of electricity produced by the customer, then 16        the electricity provider shall charge the customer for 17        the net kilowatt-hour based electricity charges 18        reflected in the customer's electric service rate 19        supplied to and used by the customer as provided in 20        paragraph (3) of this subsection (n).21            (B) If the amount of electricity produced by a 22        customer during the monthly billing period exceeds the 23        amount of electricity used by the customer during that 24        billing period, then the electricity provider 25        supplying that customer shall apply a 1:1 26        kilowatt-hour energy or monetary credit kilowatt-hour   HB3499 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1        supply charges to the customer's subsequent bill. The 2        customer shall choose between 1:1 kilowatt-hour or 3        monetary credit at the time of application. For the 4        purposes of this subsection, "kilowatt-hour supply 5        charges" means the kilowatt-hour equivalent values for 6        energy, capacity, transmission, and the purchased 7        energy adjustment, if applicable. Notwithstanding 8        anything to the contrary, customers on payment plans 9        or participating in budget billing programs shall have 10        credits applied on a monthly basis. The electricity 11        provider shall continue to carry over any excess 12        kilowatt-hour or monetary energy credits earned and 13        apply those credits to subsequent billing periods. For 14        customers with transmission or capacity charges not 15        charged on a kilowatt-hour basis, the electricity 16        provider shall prepare a reasonable approximation of 17        the kilowatt-hour equivalent value and provide that 18        value as a monetary credit. The electricity provider 19        shall submit these approximation methodologies to the 20        Commission for review, modification, and approval.21            (C) (Blank).22        (2) An electricity provider shall charge or credit for 23    the net electricity supplied to eligible customers or 24    provided by eligible customers whose electric supply 25    service is provided based on hourly pricing in the 26    following manner:  HB3499 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1            (A) If the amount of electricity used by the 2        customer during any hourly period exceeds the amount 3        of electricity produced by the customer, then the 4        electricity provider shall charge the customer for the 5        net electricity supplied to and used by the customer 6        as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection (n).7            (B) If the amount of electricity produced by a 8        customer during any hourly period exceeds the amount 9        of electricity used by the customer during that hourly 10        period, the energy provider shall calculate an energy 11        credit for the net kilowatt-hours produced in such 12        period, and shall apply that credit as a monetary 13        credit to the customer's subsequent bill. The value of 14        the energy credit shall be calculated using the same 15        price per kilowatt-hour as the electric service 16        provider would charge for kilowatt-hour energy sales 17        during that same hourly period and shall also include 18        values for capacity and transmission. For customers 19        with transmission or capacity charges not charged on a 20        kilowatt-hour basis, the electricity provider shall 21        prepare a reasonable approximation of the 22        kilowatt-hour equivalent value and provide that value 23        as a monetary credit. The electricity provider shall 24        submit these approximation methodologies to the 25        Commission for review, modification, and approval. 26        Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, customers on   HB3499 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1        payment plans or participating in budget billing 2        programs shall have credits applied on a monthly 3        basis. 4        (3) An electricity provider shall provide electric 5    service to eligible customers who utilize net metering at 6    non-discriminatory rates that are identical, with respect 7    to rate structure, retail rate components, and any monthly 8    charges, to the rates that the customer would be charged 9    if not a net metering customer. An electricity provider 10    shall charge the customer for the net electricity supplied 11    to and used by the customer according to the terms of the 12    contract or tariff to which the same customer would be 13    assigned or be eligible for if the customer was not a net 14    metering customer. An electricity provider shall not 15    charge net metering customers any fee or charge or require 16    additional equipment, insurance, or any other requirements 17    not specifically authorized by interconnection standards 18    authorized by the Commission, unless the fee, charge, or 19    other requirement would apply to other similarly situated 20    customers who are not net metering customers. The customer 21    remains responsible for the gross amount of delivery 22    services charges, supply-related charges that are kilowatt 23    based, and all taxes and fees related to such charges. The 24    customer also remains responsible for all taxes and fees 25    that would otherwise be applicable to the net amount of 26    electricity used by the customer. Paragraphs (1) and (2)   HB3499 Engrossed- 28 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1    of this subsection (n) shall not be construed to prevent 2    an arms-length agreement between an electricity provider 3    and an eligible customer that sets forth different prices, 4    terms, and conditions for the provision of net metering 5    service, including, but not limited to, the provision of 6    the appropriate metering equipment for non-residential 7    customers. Nothing in this paragraph (3) shall be 8    interpreted to mandate that a utility that is only 9    required to provide delivery services to a given customer 10    must also sell electricity to such customer. 11    (o) Within 90 days after the effective date of this 12amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, each electric 13utility subject to this Section shall file a tariff, which 14shall, consistent with the provisions of this Section, propose 15the terms and conditions under which a customer may 16participate in net metering. The tariff for electric utilities 17serving more than 200,000 customers as of January 1, 2021 18shall also provide a streamlined and transparent bill 19crediting system for net metering to be managed by the 20electric utilities. The terms and conditions shall include, 21but are not limited to, that an electric utility shall manage 22and maintain billing of net metering credits and charges 23regardless of if the eligible customer takes net metering 24under an electric utility or alternative retail electric 25supplier. The electric utility serving more than 200,000 26customers as of January 1, 2021 shall process and approve all   HB3499 Engrossed- 29 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1net metering applications, even if an eligible customer is 2served by an alternative retail electric supplier; and the 3utility shall forward application approval to the appropriate 4alternative retail electric supplier. Eligibility for net 5metering shall remain with the owner of the utility billing 6address such that, if an eligible renewable electrical 7generating facility changes ownership, the net metering 8eligibility transfers to the new owner. The electric utility 9serving more than 200,000 customers as of January 1, 2021 10shall manage net metering billing for eligible customers to 11ensure full crediting occurs on electricity bills, including, 12but not limited to, ensuring net metering crediting begins 13upon commercial operation date, net metering billing transfers 14immediately if an eligible customer switches from an electric 15utility to alternative retail electric supplier or vice versa, 16and net metering billing transfers between ownership of a 17valid billing address. All transfers referenced in the 18preceding sentence shall include transfer of all banked 19credits. All electric utilities serving 200,000 or fewer 20customers as of January 1, 2021 shall manage net metering 21billing for eligible customers receiving power and energy 22service from the electric utility to ensure full crediting 23occurs on electricity bills, ensuring net metering crediting 24begins upon commercial operation date, net metering billing 25transfers immediately if an eligible customer switches from an 26electric utility to alternative retail electric supplier or   HB3499 Engrossed- 30 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1vice versa, and net metering billing transfers between 2ownership of a valid billing address. Alternative retail 3electric suppliers providing power and energy service to 4eligible customers located within the service territory of an 5electric utility serving 200,000 or fewer customers as of 6January 1, 2021 shall manage net metering billing for eligible 7customers to ensure full crediting occurs on electricity 8bills, including, but not limited to, ensuring net metering 9crediting begins upon commercial operation date, net metering 10billing transfers immediately if an eligible customer switches 11from an electric utility to alternative retail electric 12supplier or vice versa, and net metering billing transfers 13between ownership of a valid billing address. 14(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21.) 15    (220 ILCS 5/Art. XX heading)16ARTICLE XX. RETAIL AND RENEWABLE ELECTRIC COMPETITION17(Source: P.A. 94-1095, eff. 2-2-07.) 18    (220 ILCS 5/20-101)19    Sec. 20-101. This Article may be cited as the Retail and 20Renewable Electric Competition Act of 2006.21(Source: P.A. 94-1095, eff. 2-2-07.) 22    (220 ILCS 5/20-102)23    Sec. 20-102. Findings and intent.   HB3499 Engrossed- 31 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1    (a) A competitive wholesale electricity market alone will 2not deliver the full benefits of competition to Illinois 3consumers. For Illinois consumers to receive products, prices 4and terms tailored to meet their needs, a competitive 5wholesale electricity market must be closely linked to a 6competitive retail electric market.7    (b) To date, as a result of the Electric Service Customer 8Choice and Rate Relief Law of 1997, thousands of large 9Illinois commercial and industrial consumers have experienced 10the benefits of a competitive retail electricity market. 11Alternative electric retail suppliers actively compete to 12supply electricity to large Illinois commercial and industrial 13consumers with attractive prices, terms, and conditions.14    (c) A competitive retail electric market does not yet 15exist for residential and small commercial consumers. As a 16result, millions of residential and small commercial consumers 17in Illinois are faced with escalating heating and power bills 18and are unable to shop for alternatives to the rates demanded 19by the State's incumbent electric utilities.20    (d) The General Assembly reiterates its findings from the 21Electric Service Customer Choice and Rate Relief Law of 1997 22that the Illinois Commerce Commission should promote the 23development of an effectively competitive retail electricity 24market that operates efficiently and benefits all Illinois 25consumers.26    (e) Distributed renewable energy resources, such as   HB3499 Engrossed- 32 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1distributed renewable energy generation devices and community 2renewable generation projects, are effective at providing 3electricity bill savings directly to customers and subscribers 4and indirectly to the broader base of State electricity 5consumers.6    (f) Distributed renewable energy resources provide 7substantial new capacity that directly supports the State's 8resource adequacy and reliability while ensuring that the 9State can meet its clean energy goals.10    (g) Further development of distributed renewable energy 11generation devices and community renewable generation projects 12will encourage private investment in renewable energy 13resources, support reliable electricity service, help the 14State meet its clean energy goals, enhance the overall economy 15of the State with good-paying jobs, stimulate economic growth, 16enhance the continued diversification of the State's energy 17resource mix, and protect the State's environment.18    (h) The General Assembly reiterates its findings from the 19Climate and Equitable Jobs Act (Public Act 102-662) and that 20the Illinois Commerce Commission should enable and promote the 21development of a robust market for distributed renewable 22energy generation devices and community renewable generation 23projects that benefits all State consumers. 24(Source: P.A. 94-1095, eff. 2-2-07.) 25    (220 ILCS 5/20-105)  HB3499 Engrossed- 33 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1    Sec. 20-105. Definitions. In this Article:2        "Bureau Chief Director" means the Bureau Chief 3    Director of the Office of Retail and Renewable Market 4    Development.5        "Office" means the Office of Retail and Renewable 6    Market Development.7(Source: P.A. 94-1095, eff. 2-2-07.) 8    (220 ILCS 5/20-110)9    Sec. 20-110. Office of Retail and Renewable Market 10Development. 11    (a) The Within 90 days after the effective date of this 12amendatory Act of the 94th General Assembly, subject to 13appropriation, the Commission shall establish an Office of 14Retail and Renewable Market Development and employ on its 15staff a Bureau Chief of the Office Director of Retail and 16Renewable Market Development to oversee the Office. The Bureau 17Chief Director shall have authority to employ or otherwise 18retain at least 2 professionals dedicated to the task of 19actively seeking out ways to promote retail competition in the 20State Illinois to benefit all State Illinois consumers. The 21Bureau Chief shall have further authority to employ or 22otherwise retain at least 2 professionals dedicated to the 23task of actively seeking out ways to promote distributed 24renewable energy generation devices and community renewable 25generation projects in the State to benefit all State   HB3499 Engrossed- 34 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1consumers. 2    (b) The Office shall actively seek input from all 3interested parties and shall develop a thorough understanding 4and critical analyses of the tools and techniques used to 5promote retail competition in other states.6    The Office shall monitor existing competitive conditions 7in the State Illinois, identify barriers to retail competition 8for all customer classes, and actively explore and propose to 9the Commission and to the General Assembly solutions to 10overcome identified barriers. The Bureau Chief Director may 11include municipal aggregation of customers and creating and 12designing customer choice programs as tools for retail market 13development. Solutions proposed by the Office to promote 14retail competition must also promote safe, reliable, and 15affordable electric service.16    (c) The Office shall actively seek input from all 17interested parties and shall develop a thorough understanding 18and critical analyses of the tools and techniques used to 19promote development and remove barriers to development of 20distributed renewable energy generation devices and community 21renewable generation projects. The Office shall take steps for 22interconnections involving distributed renewable energy 23resources, energy storage systems, utility-scale wind 24projects, and utility-scale solar projects, including 25interconnections to a distribution system or a transmission 26system.   HB3499 Engrossed- 35 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1    On or before July 31 of each year, the Bureau Chief 2Director shall submit a report to the Commission, the General 3Assembly, and the Governor, that details specific 4accomplishments achieved by the Office in the prior 12 months 5in promoting retail electric competition, distributed 6renewable energy generation devices, and community renewable 7generation projects and that suggests administrative and 8legislative action necessary to promote further improvements 9in retail electric competition, distributed renewable energy 10generation devices, and community renewable generation 11projects. On or before July 31, 2021 and each year thereafter, 12the report shall include the information submitted to the 13Commission pursuant to paragraph (iii) of subsection (a) of 14Section 16-115A. 15(Source: P.A. 101-590, eff. 1-1-20.) 16    (220 ILCS 5/20-130)17    Sec. 20-130. Retail choice and referral programs.18    (a) The Commission shall have the authority to establish 19retail choice and referral programs to be administered by an 20electric utility or the State in which residential and small 21commercial customers receive incentives, including, but not 22limited to, discounted rate introductory offers for switching 23to participating electric suppliers.24    (b) Reasonable costs associated with the implementation 25and operation of customer choice and referral programs may be   HB3499 Engrossed- 36 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1recovered in an electric utility's distribution rates, except 2that any costs associated with any introductory discount for 3switching to a supplier shall be assumed by that supplier. 4Reasonable costs associated with the implementation and 5operation of a customer choice program may also be recovered 6from retail electric suppliers participating in a customer 7choice and referral program. In no event, however, shall the 8Commission mandate a cost recovery mechanism without first 9providing all interested parties notice and an opportunity to 10be heard in a hearing before the Commission.11    (c) The Office of Retail and Renewable Market Development 12shall serve as the clearinghouse for the development of retail 13choice and referral programs and shall work with electric 14utilities and interested parties on a continuous basis to 15implement and improve upon the programs. Nothing in this 16Section, however, shall prevent an electric utility on its own 17accord from implementing retail choice and referral programs.18    (d) Only customers that qualify for utility service shall 19be eligible for retail choice and referral programs.20    (e) The Office of Retail and Renewable Market Development 21shall immediately upon the effective date of this amendatory 22Act of the 95th General Assembly explore for possible 23implementation on as expedited a basis as possible the 24following retail choice and referral programs:25        (1) An introductory fixed discount program in which 26    suppliers participating in the program offer customers a   HB3499 Engrossed- 37 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1    fixed percentage discount off of the electric utility's 2    supply rate for a set number of billing periods. Customers 3    would be able to enroll in the program by using an online 4    enrollment form, completing an enrollment card found in 5    their monthly electric utility bill, or by calling a 6    toll-free number. Customers would be free to withdraw from 7    the program at any time and select another alternative 8    retail electric supplier or return to the electric 9    utility.10        (2) A new customer program in which electric utilities 11    would offer consumers initiating new electric service a 12    choice of offers from participating electric suppliers to 13    provide the consumer's electric supply service. Customers 14    expressing a preference for a specific electric supplier 15    would be enrolled with that supplier. Customers not 16    expressing a preference for a specific electric supplier 17    would be offered the opportunity to enroll with an 18    electric supplier selected randomly on a rotating basis.19        (3) A customer service call center referral program in 20    which customers calling an electric utility's call center 21    would be offered enrollment with an alternative retail 22    electric supplier and informed that they have the option 23    to receive immediate savings or introductory offers by 24    participating in the referral program. Customers choosing 25    to participate would be transferred to a customer service 26    representative for the program and would either select the   HB3499 Engrossed- 38 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1    electric supplier from which they would like to take 2    service or be placed with a participating electric 3    supplier chosen at random on a rotating basis. 4    Nothing in this Section shall prevent the Office of Retail 5and Renewable Market Development or the Commission from 6considering retail choice and referral programs in addition to 7the programs outlined in this Section. 8(Source: P.A. 95-700, eff. 11-9-07.) 9    (220 ILCS 5/20-140 new)10    Sec. 20-140. Interconnection Working Group.11    (a) The Interconnection Working Group, as described in 12subsection (h-5) of Section 16-107.5 of this Act, shall 13collect, share, and examine data on Level 1 interconnection 14costs, including the cost and type of upgrades required for 15interconnection, and use this data to inform the final 16standardized cost of Level 1 interconnection. The 17Interconnection Working Group shall determine a single 18standardized cost for Level 1 interconnections, which shall 19not exceed $200.20    (b) In collaboration with the General Counsel of the 21Commission, the Office shall develop policies and procedures 22to facilitate employees of the Office in leading the 23Interconnection Working Group without interference with 24docketed proceedings. The policies and procedures developed 25under this subsection (b) shall be designed to allow the   HB3499 Engrossed- 39 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1Interconnection Working Group to work without interruption. 2    (220 ILCS 5/20-145 new)3    Sec. 20-145. Interconnection monitoring.4    (a) The Office may employ, designate, or otherwise retain 5the services of an Ombudsperson who, in addition to the roles 6described in this Act, is responsible for oversight of a 7utility's compliance with the rules adopted under this Section 8and any other utility interconnection policies or procedures. 9The Ombudsperson may be paid in full or in part through fees 10levied on the initiators of the dispute.11    (b) The Ombudsperson may request, and each electric 12utility shall timely provide, records and information as the 13Ombudsperson may require from time to time to carry out his or 14her duties under this Section.15    (c) The Office shall monitor interconnection between 16electric utilities and applicants for interconnection and 17interconnection customers. The Office may request, and 18electric utilities shall promptly provide, information and 19records related to pending, successful, and terminated 20interconnections. The Office shall take these steps for 21interconnections involving distributed renewable energy 22resources, energy storage systems, utility-scale wind 23projects, and utility-scale solar projects, including 24interconnections to a distribution system or a transmission 25system.  HB3499 Engrossed- 40 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1    (d) The Office may require electric utilities to perform a 2system impact and facilities study to provide a detailed 3breakdown of the non-binding costs of operation and an 4estimate that individually itemizes operational costs, 5including equipment by type or model, labor, operation and 6maintenance, engineering and design, permitting, easements and 7rights-of-way, direct overhead, and indirect overhead.8    (e) The Office is authorized to establish an informal 9interconnection dispute resolution process consistent with the 10Commission's existing rules. Any dispute submitted pursuant to 11the provisions of this subsection (e) shall be in a form and 12manner as determined by the Bureau Chief. In addition to any 13other dispute resolution provisions under the Commission's 14rules, an electric utility, an interconnection customer, or an 15interconnection applicant, may submit a dispute pursuant to 16this subsection (e) and the Ombudsperson, or his or her 17designee, shall provide a recommended resolution of such 18dispute within 30 days after the Ombudsperson determines that 19full information from all parties to the dispute has been 20received. The electric utility, the interconnection customer, 21the interconnection applicant, or any other party authorized 22to initiate dispute resolution under the Commission's rules 23authorized by this Act may include the Ombudsperson's 24recommendation in any further formal dispute resolution before 25the Commission. Nothing in this subsection (e) prohibits the 26Ombudsperson from taking part in a dispute as required by this   HB3499 Engrossed- 41 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1Section or the Commission's rules.2    (f) The Office is encouraged to include at least one 3employee, at the Bureau Chief's discretion, with a background 4in engineering of renewable resources and distribution 5interconnections.  HB3499 Engrossed- 42 -LRB104 09282 AAS 19340 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    220 ILCS 5/16-107.54    220 ILCS 5/Art. XX heading5    220 ILCS 5/20-1016    220 ILCS 5/20-1027    220 ILCS 5/20-1058    220 ILCS 5/20-1109    220 ILCS 5/20-13010    220 ILCS 5/20-140 new11    220 ILCS 5/20-145 new